District of Columbia statutes.
44-1210

Appropriations.

Sufficient funds to carry out the requirements of this chapter are authorized to be appropriated out of the general revenues of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-80, § 11, 36 DCR 8469

Cross References

Traffic adjudication, criminal offenses, offenses contained in this chapter, see § 50-2302.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1610.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of sections, see §§ 2 to 7 of Safety Net Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-112, April 13, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4060).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Safety Net Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-221, December 21, 2001, 49 DCR 404).
For temporary (90 day) financial assistance to nonprofit corporations that have increased demand for services because of the events of September 11, 2001, see §§ 2 to 7 of Safety Net Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-301, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 3389).